District of Columbia statutes.
1-129.08

Repealed

Establishment of Statehood Delegation Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 18
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-226, § 102, 51 DCR 10539
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884
This section is referenced in § 1-129.01, § 1-129.03, and § 47-1812.11c.